Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
Article 6 Construction of Lighthouses and
Other Navigational Aids by
United States Government

Cross references.

Authority of Department of Transportation to exercise power of eminent domain for construction and maintenance of intracoastal waterway, § 52-3-5.

22-3-120.
Condemnation for construction of lighthouses, beacons, and other navigational aides.

In any county in which the United States government authorizes the construction of lighthouses, beacons, range lights, or any other structure designed to assist the navigation of the waters of this state, any proper agency of the United States and the mayor of any city in that county shall mark out, by metes and bounds, the property necessary to be taken and shall convey to the owner of the property or of any interest therein notice of the planned construction. If the agency of the United States and the owner cannot agree on the compensation to be paid for taking the land, the Governor shall appoint one person and the owner of the land another; and these two shall select a third person. The three persons so selected shall constitute a commission to assess the just and adequate compensation to be paid according to the general method of condemning land provided in Article 1 of Chapter 2 of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 118, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 26; Civil Code 1910, § 27; Code 1933, § 36-1101.

22-3-121.
Acquisition of right to enter lands and clear or cut timber for purposes of carrying out survey of coasts — Generally.

Any person employed under the act of the Congress of the United States providing for a survey of the coasts may enter upon lands within this state and clear or cut timber upon the same for any purpose legitimately connected with and necessary to carry out the survey, provided that no unnecessary injury be done thereby and all damages to the owner of the land be promptly paid.

History.

Laws 1847, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 155; Code 1863, § 25; Code 1868, § 23; Code 1873, § 23; Code 1882, § 23; Civil Code 1895, § 27; Civil Code 1910, § 28; Code 1933, § 36-1102.

U.S. Code.

The federal Act referred to in this section is codified at

33 U.S.C. § 883

a, which provides for the activities which the director of the Coast and Geodetic Survey is authorized to conduct.

22-3-122.
Acquisition of right to enter lands and clear or cut timber for purposes of carrying out survey of coasts — Manner of assessment where parties cannot agree on compensation.

If the parties representing the government of the United States and the owner of the property or of any interest therein pursuant to Code Section 22-3-121 cannot agree upon the amount of compensation to be paid for the property, the damages shall be assessed as provided in this title.

History.

Laws 1847, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 155; Code 1863, § 26; Code 1868, § 24; Code 1873, § 24; Code 1882, § 24; Civil Code 1895, § 28; Civil Code 1910, § 29; Code 1933, § 36-1103.